Utah statutes.
54-1-10.   Conservation planning -- Annual reports.
The Public Service Commission shall engage in long-range planning regarding
public utility regulatory policy in order to facilitate the well-planned
development and conservation of utility resources. The commission shall make
and submit to the governor and the Legislature an annual report containing a
full and complete account of the transactions of its office, together with any
facts, suggestions and recommendations it may deem necessary. The Division of
Public Utilities shall provide any assistance the commission may require in
the preparation of the annual report.  The report shall be made and submitted
by October 1 of each year or as soon after as may be feasible and shall be
published as are the reports of other departments of the state.
